New York, session 2025-2026, A7264.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clause 8 of subparagraph (i) of the opening paragraph of 2 section 1210 of the tax law, as amended by chapter 245 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (8) the county of Allegany is hereby further authorized and empowered 5 to adopt and amend local laws, ordinances or resolutions imposing such 6 taxes at a rate which is: (i) one percent additional to the three 7 percent rate authorized above in this paragraph for such county for the 8 period beginning December first, nineteen hundred eighty-six and ending 9 November thirtieth, two thousand four; and (ii) one and one-half percent 10 additional to the three percent rate authorized above in this paragraph 11 for such county for the period beginning December first, two thousand 12 four and ending November thirtieth, two thousand [twenty-five] twenty- 13 seven; 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10893-01-5